District of Columbia statutes.
42-3131.05a

Notice by mail.

Notice shall be deemed to be served properly on the date when mailed by first class mail to the owner of record of the vacant building at the owner’s mailing address as updated in the real property tax records of the Office of Tax and Revenue. Notice shall also be posted on the vacant building.

History

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 115, ch. 1626, § 5a
as added Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-216, § 3(b), 55 DCR 7500

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-259, March 8, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 3044).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-102, February 2, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4254).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Nuisance Abatement Notice Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-252, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 1958).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-586, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 353).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-173, November 2, 2007, 54 DCR 11204).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-436, July 16, 2008, 55 DCR 8272).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Nuisance Abatement Notice Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-569, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1056, 21 STAT 711).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Nuisance Abatement Notice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-15, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3845, 21 DCSTAT 842).

Editor's Notes

Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 17-216 provided that sections 2, 3, and 4(b) and (c) shall apply to real property tax years beginning after September 30, 2006.